Utah statutes.
47-3-304.   Fees.

(1)  Reasonable fees for the use of a shooting range to cover the incidental material and supply costs incurred by making the range available to a group, may be established by:

(a)  the State Armory Board established under Title 39, Chapter 2, State Armory Board, for a military range; and

(b)  for a nonmilitary range, the state agency, institution of higher education, or political subdivision that operates or has control of the range.

(2)  Fees for nonmilitary shooting range use may not exceed fees charged by the Department of Natural Resources for the same or similar activity.

(3)  Fees collected under Subsection (1) shall be:

(a)  for a shooting range operated or controlled by a state agency or an institution of higher education, deposited in the General Fund as dedicated credits to be used for the operation and maintenance of the range; and

(b)  for a shooting range operated or controlled by a political subdivision, deposited in the political subdivision's general fund.



Enacted by Chapter 155, 2013 General Session

